Utah statutes.
32A-4a-305.   Operational restrictions.
(1) (a)  A person granted a resort license and the employees and management
personnel of the resort licensee or otherwise related to a resort spa
sublicense shall comply with this title, the rules of the commission, and the
conditions and requirements in this section in the operation of the resort
spa.
(b)  Subject to Section 32A-4a-502, failure to comply with this section may
result in a suspension or revocation of the resort license or resort spa
sublicense, or other disciplinary action taken against individual employees or
management personnel.
(2)  Subject to the other provisions of this section, a person operating under
a resort spa sublicense may not sell an alcoholic beverage to or allow a
person to be admitted to or use the resort spa sublicense premises other than:
(a)  a resident;
(b)  a public customer who holds a valid customer card issued under Subsection
(4); or
(c)  an invitee.
(3)  A person operating under a resort spa sublicense may allow an individual
to be admitted to or use the resort spa sublicense premises as an invitee
subject to the following conditions:
(a)  the individual must be previously authorized by one of the following who
agrees to host the individual as an invitee into the resort spa:
(i)  a resident; or
(ii)  a public customer who holds a valid customer card issued under
Subsection (4);
(b)  the individual has only those privileges derived from the individual's
host for the duration of the invitee's visit to the resort spa; and
(c)  a resort licensee, resort spa, or an employee of the resort licensee or
resort spa may not enter into an agreement or arrangement with a resident or
public customer to indiscriminately host a member of the general public into
the resort spa as an invitee.
(4)  A person operating under a resort spa sublicense may issue a customer
card to allow an individual to enter and use the resort spa sublicense
premises on a temporary basis under the following conditions:
(a)  the resort spa may not issue a customer card for a time period that
exceeds three weeks;
(b)  the resort spa shall assess a fee to a public customer for a customer
card;
(c)  the resort spa may not issue a customer card to a minor; and
(d)  a public customer may not host more than seven invitees at one time.
(5) (a)  For purposes of the resort spa sublicense, the resort licensee shall
ensure that an expense ledger or record is maintained showing in detail:
(i)  quarterly expenditures for the resort spa separated by payments for:
(A)  malt or brewed beverage;
(B)  liquor;
(C)  food;
(D)  set-ups; and
(E)  any other item required by the department; and
(ii)  sales made separately for:
(A)  malt or brewed beverages;
(B)  liquor;
(C)  food;
(D)  set-ups; and
(E)  any other item required by the department.
(b)  For purposes of the resort spa sublicense, the resort licensee shall
ensure that a record required by this Subsection (5) is kept:
(i)  in a form approved by the department; and
(ii)  current for each three-month period.
(c)  An expenditure under resort spa sublicense shall be supported by:
(i)  a delivery ticket;
(ii)  an invoice;
(iii)  a receipted bill;
(iv)  a canceled check;
(v)  a petty cash voucher; or
(vi)  other sustaining datum or memorandum.
(d)  In addition to a ledger or record required by Subsection (5)(a), for
purposes of the resort spa sublicense, a resort licensee shall ensure that
accounting and other records and documents as the department may require are
maintained.
(e)  A resort licensee or an employee acting for the resort licensee or under
a resort spa sublicense, who knowingly forges, falsifies, alters, cancels,
destroys, conceals, or removes an entry in a book of account or other document
for a resort spa sublicense required to be made, maintained, or preserved by
this title or the rules of the commission for the purpose of deceiving the
commission, the department, or an official or employee of the commission or
department, is subject to:
(i)  the suspension or revocation of the resort spa sublicense; and
(ii)  possible criminal prosecution under Chapter 12, Criminal Offenses.
(f) (i)  For purposes of the resort spa sublicense, the resort licensee shall
ensure that a record required by this section is kept and maintained, and a
book, record, receipt, or disbursement is maintained or used for the resort
spa sublicense:
(A)  as the department requires; and
(B)  for a minimum period of three years.
(ii)  A record, book, receipt, or disbursement is subject to inspection by an
authorized representative of the commission and the department.
(iii)  A resort licensee shall allow the department, through an auditor or
examiner of the department, to audit the records for a resort spa sublicense
at the times the department considers advisable.
(iv)  The department shall audit the records for a resort spa sublicense at
least once annually.
(6)  A resort licensee shall own or lease premises suitable for the resort
spa's activities.
(7) (a)  A resort licensee may not maintain a premises in a manner that
barricades or conceals the resort spa sublicense's operation.
(b)  A member of the commission, authorized department personnel, or a peace
officer shall, upon presentation of credentials, be admitted immediately to a
resort spa sublicense premises and permitted without hindrance or delay to
inspect completely the entire resort spa sublicense premises and the books and
records for the resort spa sublicense, at any time during which the resort spa
sublicense is open for the transaction of business with a resident.
(8)  A resort spa must have food available at all times when an alcoholic
beverage is sold, served, or consumed on the resort spa sublicense premises.
(9) (a)  Liquor may not be purchased for a resort spa sublicense except from a
state store or package agency.
(b)  Liquor purchased from a state store or package agency may be transported
by the resort licensee from the place of purchase to the resort spa sublicense
premises.
(c)  Payment for liquor shall be made in accordance with rules established by
the commission.
(10)  A person operating under a resort spa sublicense may sell or provide a
primary spirituous liquor only in a quantity not to exceed 1.5 ounces per
beverage dispensed through a calibrated metered dispensing system approved by
the department in accordance with commission rules adopted under this title,
except that:
(a)  spirituous liquor need not be dispensed through a calibrated metered
dispensing system if used as a secondary flavoring ingredient in a beverage
subject to the following restrictions:
(i)  the secondary ingredient may be dispensed only in conjunction with the
purchase of a primary spirituous liquor;
(ii)  the secondary ingredient may not be the only spirituous liquor in the
beverage;
(iii)  the resort licensee shall designate a location where flavorings are
stored on the floor plan provided to the department; and
(iv)  a flavoring container shall be plainly and conspicuously labeled
"flavorings";
(b)  spirituous liquor need not be dispensed through a calibrated metered
dispensing system if used:
(i)  as a flavoring on a dessert; and
(ii)  in the preparation of a flaming food dish, drink, or dessert; and
(c)  a person at a resort spa may have no more than:
(i)  2.5 ounces of spirituous liquor at a time before the person; or
(ii)  two spirituous liquor drinks at a time before a resort spa patron,
except that the resort spa patron may not have two spirituous liquor drinks
before the resort spa patron if one of the spirituous liquor drinks consists
only of the primary spirituous liquor for the other spirituous liquor drink.
(11) (a) (i)  Wine may be sold and served by the glass or an individual
portion not to exceed five ounces per glass or individual portion.
(ii)  An individual portion may be served to a person in more than one glass
as long as the total amount of wine does not exceed five ounces.
(iii)  An individual portion of wine is considered to be one alcoholic
beverage under Subsection (15)(c).
(b) (i)  Wine may be sold and served in a container not exceeding 1.5 liters
at a price fixed by the commission to a table of four or more persons.
(ii)  Wine may be sold and served in a container not exceeding 750 milliliters
at a price fixed by the commission to a table of less than four persons.
(c)  A wine service may be performed and a service charge assessed by a resort
spa as authorized by commission rule for wine purchased at the resort spa.
(12) (a)  Heavy beer may be served in an original container not exceeding one
liter at a price fixed by the commission.
(b)  A flavored malt beverage may be served in an original container not
exceeding one liter at a price fixed by the commission.
(c)  A service charge may be assessed by the resort spa for heavy beer or a
flavored malt beverage purchased at the resort spa.
(13) (a) (i)  Subject to Subsection (13)(a)(ii), a person operating under a
resort spa sublicense may sell beer for on-premise consumption:
(A)  in an open container; and
(B)  on draft.
(ii)  Beer sold pursuant to Subsection (13)(a)(i) shall be in a size of
container that does not exceed two liters, except that beer may not be sold to
an individual in a size of container that exceeds one liter.
(b) (i)  A person operating under a resort spa sublicense who sells beer
pursuant to Subsection (13)(a):
(A)  may do so without obtaining a separate on-premise beer retailer license
from the commission; and
(B)  shall comply with all appropriate operational restrictions under Chapter
10, Beer Retailer Licenses, that apply to an on-premise beer retailer except
when those restrictions are inconsistent with or less restrictive than the
operational restrictions under this part.
(ii)  Failure to comply with the operational restrictions under Chapter 10,
Beer Retailer Licenses, required by Subsection (13)(b)(i), may result in a
suspension or revocation of:
(A)  the resort spa sublicense; and
(B)  an alcoholic beverage license issued by a local authority.
(14)  An alcoholic beverage may not be stored, served, or sold in a place
other than as designated in the resort licensee's application, unless the
resort licensee first applies for and receives approval from the department
for a change of location within the resort spa.
(15) (a)  A person may only make an alcoholic beverage purchase in the resort
spa from and be served by a person employed, designated, and trained by the
resort licensee or an agent of the resort license to sell, dispense, and serve
an alcoholic beverage.
(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (15)(a), a person who purchases bottled wine
from an employee described in Subsection (15)(a) or carries bottled wine onto
the resort spa sublicense premises pursuant to Subsection (22) may thereafter
serve wine from the bottle to the person or others at the person's table.
(c)  An individual furnished an alcoholic beverage at a resort spa may have no
more than two alcoholic beverages of any kind at a time before the individual,
subject to the limitation of Subsection (10)(c)(ii).
(16)  The liquor storage area shall remain locked at all times other than
those hours and days when liquor sales and service are authorized by law.
(17) (a)  An alcoholic beverage may only be consumed at a table or counter.
(b)  An alcoholic beverage may not be served to or consumed by a person at a
bar.
(18) (a)  Liquor may not be sold, offered for sale, served, or otherwise
furnished at a resort spa after 1 a.m. or before 10 a.m.
(b)  The hours of beer sales and service are those specified in Chapter 10,
Beer Retailer Licenses, for on-premise beer licenses.
(c) (i)  Notwithstanding Subsections (18)(a) and (b), a resort spa shall
remain open for one hour after the resort spa ceases the sale and service of
an alcoholic beverage during which time a person at the resort spa may finish
consuming:
(A)  a single drink containing spirituous liquor;
(B)  a single serving of wine not exceeding five ounces;
(C)  a single serving of heavy beer;
(D)  a single serving of beer not exceeding 26 ounces; or
(E)  a single serving of a flavored malt beverage.
(ii)  A resort spa is not required to remain open:
(A)  after all persons have vacated the resort spa sublicense premises; or
(B)  during an emergency.
(d)  Between the hours of 2 a.m. and 10 a.m. a person operating under a resort
spa sublicense may not allow a person to remain on the resort spa sublicense
premises to consume an alcoholic beverage on the resort spa sublicense
premises.
(19)  An alcoholic beverage may not be sold, served, or otherwise furnished to
a:
(a)  minor;
(b)  person actually, apparently, or obviously intoxicated;
(c)  known habitual drunkard; or
(d)  known interdicted person.
(20) (a) (i)  Liquor may be sold only at a price fixed by the commission.
(ii)  Liquor may not be sold at a discount price on any date or at any time.
(b)  An alcoholic beverage may not be sold at less than the cost of the
alcoholic beverage for the resort spa sublicense.
(c)  An alcoholic beverage may not be sold at a special or reduced price that
encourages over consumption or intoxication.
(d)  The price of a single serving of a primary spirituous liquor shall be the
same whether served as a single drink or in conjunction with another alcoholic
beverage.
(e)  An alcoholic beverage may not be sold at a special or reduced price for
only certain hours of the resort spa's business day such as a "happy hour."
(f)  More than one alcoholic beverage may not be sold or served for the price
of a single alcoholic beverage.
(g)  An indefinite or unlimited number of alcoholic beverages may not be sold
or served during a set period for a fixed price.
(h)  A person operating under a resort spa sublicense may not engage in a
promotion involving or offering a free alcoholic beverage to a person at the
resort spa.
(21)  An alcoholic beverage may not be purchased for a person at the resort
spa by:
(a)  the resort licensee; or
(b)  an employee or agent of the resort licensee or resort spa.
(22) (a)  A person may not bring onto the resort spa sublicense premises an
alcoholic beverage for on-premise consumption, except that a person may bring,
subject to the discretion of the resort licensee, bottled wine onto the resort
spa sublicense premises for on-premise consumption.
(b)  Except as provided in Subsection (22)(a), a person operating under a
resort spa sublicense including an officer, manager, employee, or agent of a
resort spa or resort licensee may not allow a person to bring onto the resort
spa sublicense premises an alcoholic beverage for consumption on the resort
spa license premises.
(c)  If bottled wine is carried in by a person, the person shall deliver the
wine to a server or other representative of the resort spa upon entering the
resort spa.
(d)  A wine service may be performed and a service charge assessed by the
resort spa as authorized by commission rule for wine carried in by a person.
(23) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (23)(b), a person operating under a
resort spa sublicense or an employee of that person may not permit a person to
carry from the resort spa sublicense premises an open container that:
(i)  is used primarily for drinking purposes; and
(ii)  contains an alcoholic beverage.
(b)  A person may remove the unconsumed contents of a bottle of wine, if
before removal, the bottle is recorked or recapped.
(24) (a)  A minor may not be admitted into, use, or be on:
(i)  the sublicense premises of a resort spa unless accompanied by a person 21
years of age or older; or
(ii)  a lounge or bar area, as defined by commission rule, of the resort spa
sublicense premises.
(b) (i)  Except as provided in Subsection (24)(b)(ii), a resort licensee or a
person operating under a resort spa sublicense may not employ a minor to:
(A)  sell, dispense, or handle an alcoholic beverage; or
(B)  work in a lounge or bar area of the resort spa sublicense premises.
(ii)  A resort licensee or a person operating under a resort spa sublicense
may employ a minor who is at least 16 years of age to enter the sale at a cash
register or other sales recording device, except that a minor may not work in
a lounge or bar area of the resort spa sublicense premises.
(25)  An employee for a resort spa, while on duty, may not:
(a)  consume an alcoholic beverage; or
(b)  be intoxicated.
(26) (a)  A person operating under a resort spa sublicense shall have
available on the resort spa sublicense premises for a person to review at the
time that the customer requests it, a written alcoholic beverage price list or
a menu containing the price of an alcoholic beverage sold or served by the
resort spa including:
(i)  a set-up charge;
(ii)  a service charge; or
(iii)  a chilling fee.
(b)  A charge or fee made in connection with the sale, service, or consumption
of liquor may be stated in food or alcoholic beverage menus including:
(i)  a set-up charge;
(ii)  a service charge; or
(iii)  a chilling fee.
(27)  For purposes of the resort spa sublicense, the resort licensee shall
ensure that the following are displayed in a prominent place in the resort
spa:
(a)  the resort spa sublicense that is issued by the department;
(b)  a list of the types and brand names of liquor being served through its
calibrated metered dispensing system; and
(c)  a sign in large letters stating: "Warning: Driving under the influence of
alcohol or drugs is a serious crime that is prosecuted aggressively in Utah."
(28)  A person operating under a resort spa sublicense may not on the resort
spa sublicense premises:
(a)  engage in or permit any form of gambling, as defined and proscribed in
Title 76, Chapter 10, Part 11, Gambling;
(b)  have any video gaming device, as defined and proscribed in Title 76,
Chapter 10, Part 11, Gambling; or
(c)  engage in or permit a contest, game, gaming scheme, or gaming device that
requires the risking of something of value for a return or for an outcome when
the return or outcome is based upon an element of chance, excluding the
playing of an amusement device that confers only an immediate and unrecorded
right of replay not exchangeable for value.
(29)  A resort spa sublicense may not be transferred from one location to
another location, without prior written approval of the commission.
(30) (a)  A resort licensee, may not sell, transfer, assign, exchange, barter,
give, or attempt in any way to dispose of the resort spa sublicense to another
person, whether for monetary gain or not.
(b)  A resort spa sublicense has no monetary value for the purpose of any type
of disposition.
(31)  A person operating under a resort spa sublicense or an employee of that
person may not knowingly allow a person on the resort spa sublicense premises
to, in violation of Title 58, Chapter 37, Utah Controlled Substances Act, or
Chapter 37a, Utah Drug Paraphernalia Act:
(a)  sell, distribute, possess, or use a controlled substance, as defined in
Section 58-37-2; or
(b)  use, deliver, or possess with the intent to deliver drug paraphernalia,
as defined in Section 58-37a-3.
